



Ending Our FG Angels Experiment - Feld Thoughts























































































 

















Press enter to search
 

Archive
Marathons
Books
About
Legal
 
Back to Top





January 5, 2016
Ending Our FG Angels Experiment


After two years of a dedicated experiment, we’ve decided to stop making new investments via our FG Angels Syndicate. We’ve learned a lot, achieved some of our goals, but ultimately have decided that the effort required to maintain our investment pace on AngelList is too great for us, at least for now. More on that in a bit, but let’s start with some history.
The Monday after AngelList announced their Syndicate product in September 2013 we decided to to jump in with both feet and start FG Angels. As a result, we were one of the very first syndicates and the first VC firm to create a syndicate.
We had several high level goals:

Understand how AngelList and Syndicates worked by actively participating;
Be able to experiment with seed investments outside of our themes;
Extend our network of entrepreneurs and angel investors; and
Generate additional economic returns for our funds.

It took a few months for AngelList to gear up Syndicates so that they actually worked. As a result our first investment wasn’t made until early January when we invested in OnTheGo Platforms, which was just acquired by Atheer.
Our plan was to make 50 investments, directly committing $2.5m from our funds ($50k from us for each investment) through 2014. When we did a retrospective on our first year of FG Angels, we had invested in 42 companies. Seth did a nice job of summarizing what the deals and the syndicate activity for the first year looked like.

Total number of investments: 42
Average syndicate investment amount per deal: $316k
Largest syndicate investment in any single deal: $785k
Total number syndicate investors (syndicate members who invested in at least one FG Angels deal): 116
Total number of investors (all investors who have joined FG Angels in at least one deal): 410
# of investors who have participated in at least half of FG Angels deals: 30
Most active syndicate member investment total: $905k across 41 of our 42 FG Angels deals
% of investments with a female co-founder: > 20%

Our plan was not to generate investment deal flow for us to follow on with our main funds. Instead, we took a one time seed investor approach patterned after an angel strategy that I’ve used for almost 20 years that has now generated a realized return over 10x invested capital and still has about half the money at play.
We’ve ended up investing in three companies through our main funds that we had invested in first with FG Angels (Mattermark, Revolar, and Havenly). However, both Revolar and Havenly went through accelerator programs that we are involved with (Techstars and MergeLane, respectively), which allowed us even more perspective into working with them.
We decided to continue making FG Angels investments through 2015 at about the same pace. By the end of 2015, we had made a total of 65 FG Angels investments. We have 49 funded Backers, a 236 unfunded Backers, a total syndicate backing of $976,653, and an estimated 30 day raise of $171,058.
At the end of 2015, we revisited the goals I mentioned at the beginning of this post. Let’s see how we did and what we learned.
Goal 1: Understand how AngelList and Syndicates worked by actively participating: In addition to understanding in depth how AngelList and Syndicates worked, I’d like to think we helped Naval and his awesome team at AngelList on figuring out the legal, workflow, and UX dynamics around AngelList. We’re fans of both AngelList and Syndicates and it was important to us to give back to the platform and help them work through the dynamics involved in creating and rolling out their Syndicates product.
Goal 2: Be able to experiment with seed investments outside our themes: While we did a lot of investments outside our themes, we generated very little incremental learning on our part. While we could be very helpful in a generic early investor way, the time to value ratio was way off in both directions. While we regularly did short, quick hit help via email, whenever someone wanted to spend an hour or more with one of us, we eventually realized that our investment and ownership in the company was dramatically underweighted. And, this took time away (we each have a finite number of hours each week) from companies we had much larger investments in. We also realized that we were getting the experimentation value and learning at a greater rate from our deep engagement in Techstars.
Goal 3: Extend our network of entrepreneurs and angel investors: As we expected, our network of entrepreneurs was expanded (by about 150 people across the 65 companies.) These founders are active members of our portfolio and our goal is to be helpful to them any way we can, given time constraints. However, we have been disappointed in how we have – or haven’t – been effective at building a broader network of angel investors. We’ve made some new friends and built strong connections with a few angels in the syndicate, but we’ve struggled to build any kind of extended community. The tools for this on AngelList just aren’t there yet and we haven’t committed the resources to do this separately. And, ultimately, some face to face time is likely needed which we haven’t been willing to do.
Goal 4: Generate additional economic returns for our funds: We’ve invested about $3.2 million in FG Angels and are excited about the portfolio. However, it’s a very early stage portfolio that will take a very long time to mature. Even when you include the carry we are getting on FG Angels (15%), this total amount represents less than one fund investment on our part (our typical investment size is $5m to $15m, with this growing to as much as $40m when you include our late stage fund.) Even if we generate a huge multiple on our overall FG Angels investment (say 10x), the impact on our fund return is limited given the size of the investments we were making.
Ultimately, we’ve decided that the effort that we are putting into FG Angels is too great for us to continue on in the way that we’ve have been for the past two years. However, by running the experiment, we’ve better understood the leverage points at the angel / seed level that AngelList and Syndicates create, which for some investors, and many entrepreneurs, is very powerful. Finally, we’d like to believe that we’ve contributed to the evolution and dynamic of angel / seed investing through this effort.
While we are no longer going to be actively making FG Angels investments, every now and then we might do something out of FG Angels. We continue to believe that AngelList Syndicates is an effective platform for companies and investors. We simply felt that we needed to better balance the time and effort we were spending on FG Angels relative to the weight it has in our overall portfolio.
It’s important to all of us at Foundry Group to experiment around the edges of our industry and to push the boundaries of the venture model to find new and innovative ways to create value for our investors while supporting as broad a set of entrepreneurs as possible. We’ll continue to look for ways to do that.










vpandya



This is an Awesome Article. – Hanuman Chalisa






Rick Moss – Better Ventures



Kudos to you and Foundry Group for doing this and sharing your learning. Can you put this into the context of venture investing doesn’t scale? Sounds like you’re saying it was more work than benefit versus focusing on your larger investments and getting many of the same benefits from working with accelerators? And I also see a connection to your increased focus on investing in funds which is of course more scalable than syndicate investments. Thanks, Brad!






bfeld



I would not put it in the context of venture investing doesn’t scale.
For example, if we hired a dedicated partner to do this, we could manage it. Or if we hired an associate whose job it was to organize, leverage, and get value out of the investor network being created, that part would be more effective. And, while AngelList has great software, there’s a bunch of stuff missing that we would have liked. We could have built a small team to write this…
But we chose not to. Our core team strategy has been not to add anyone, to stay very lean (e.g. no associates), and minimize overhead associated with managing a team. That’s one of the strategy tradeoffs we’ve made and weren’t willing to change it for this.
We could have certainly put more money into each AngelList deal (instead of $50k). But we wanted to solve the other things first.






Dabelon



Awesome post.  What software tools/features do you think are missing in terms of interacting with your investor network?






bfeld



It’s a long list. We spent some time sketching it out and then decided we were only dealing with it at a surface level so we stopped when we knew we weren’t going to execute on it.








Rick Moss – Better Ventures



Got it. Thanks again.










Jud Valeski



Awesome run down and transparency. Thanks. 






Pierre Powell



Brad, thanks, it was fun.   I think we invested in all but two companies.   My experiement/goal was different.   We are Oil & Gas people.   And I look at investing in oil wells like investing in start-ups; with NOT a normal distribution of return, but a skewed distribution; i.e. the mode, median, and mean are displaced.
My idea was if you invest in ONE company, the most likely return is the mode, which is displaced in a skewed distribution from the mean; and it means you will most-likely return less.   However, if I can invest a little, in a lot (with someone smart at the helm), then I can move my return from mode to mean.  
The things I really didn’t consider is the syndicate angels really had a difficult time obtaining enough information on whether we should or even could invest in later rounds; I’d want to follow your lead.   
Also, not sure about all the logistics of returns and the like, for example, I know that ONTHEGOPLATFORMS was acquired, not sure what that means for the syndicate, or us as a syndicate angel.
Many Blessings






bfeld



Re: OnTheGo – you should have received a message from them via AngelList. It was a stock for stock transaction – so we now own shares in Aether (the acquirer).






pointsnfigures



That’s an interesting point on following on, and pro rata.








Chris Amelinckx



Thanks Brad. Do you have a suggestion for teams looking for Angel investment with an affinity for the great work at Foundry?






bfeld



Just email me. We still make seed investments and will occasionally do something via FG Angels.








TejDhawan



Once I get over the sadness, I will re-read and promise to understand the economics without emotion :). Thanks for all your team did to help the syndicated angel community grow past infancy.






bfeld



Smile!








Frank W. Miller



Hmm. Interesting.  Thanks for putting this together.  It has been an interesting way for me to dip my toe in the water for angel investing.  I’m only in five companies with little bitty investments but kinda fun.  I’m worried I have not been promiscuous enuff to have a good chance at that 10x-100x but I feel like one of them might in the future have something happen.  I guess we’ll see.  Its been more than a year since these investments were made.  I guess the last bit of experience I gain will be how long it takes for any of these to come to a conclusion, good or bad.






bfeld



Timing – expect at least a decade for full resolution – probably longer. I’ve still got angel investments from the 1990s that are live / active (and successful) companies.








Mac



A pattern has evolved.  Every time over the past four years, when you’ve returned from being off the grid, it seems like big changes occur.  Not certain what that forecast for 2016.  🙂  Thanks for the FG Angels experiment.  Liked the idea of seed investing with Foundry Group in a leadership/ management role.  






bfeld



I think the timing is more around the end of the year (and my sabbaticals have been in November, which just happens to correspond when we have been making decisions around – or implementing – new big new things.
We have another thing we are winding down (which I’ll blog about in the next few weeks) where the decision was made nine months ago to make a major change in what we were doing and then another decision was made at the end of Q3 to shut the initiative down. We are in the “finishing it up and ready to talk about it” stage for that also.








Dariel Luciano



Neat post. How did you guys go about thinking when it was time for you to move away from angellist? Was it a series of conversations that ended up in that decision or did you have a predetermined benchmark you wanted to hit and then stop? Just trying to understand how fg thinks about when it’s time to cut something off.






bfeld



We talked about it a few times. The first was at the end of 2014 (our first year of doing FG Angels) and decided to just continue for a while.Then we probably talked about it at the end of Q2 and the end of Q3. 
At the end of Q3, we decided to finish the investments we had in our pipeline and then stop.








Elizabeth Kraus



Great post. I benefited tremendously from my participation. Excellent diversification for a small amount of capital. It increased my profile on AngelList which has increased my credibility and our deal flow for MergeLane. Seeing the terms of all of the deals was a great benchmark for setting valuations and terms. I got to know the team at AngelList and saw their ability to innovate on a dime. And like you touched on, it made me realize how hard it is to add value to a portfolio that big. Great learning for going forward. 
I am 100% glad I did it, but decided to take a break because the volume got a little overwhelming. In the future, I think I’ll continue to invest in syndicates, but will 1) invest in syndicates investing in 10 or fewer deals per year or 2) lower my expectations of myself for tracking the deals and the updates. I think viewing it more as a diversification tool and broad deal flow funnel makes more sense than trying to view it through the same lens as my other angel investments.
And re: building the community of angels, it might have had a bigger impact than you think. It is really hard to figure out who is interested in angel investing and AngelList is quickly changing that. I’ve met at least twenty angels because they created a profile on AngelList just to join your syndicate. I’ve also had a few investors reach out to me because they saw my involvement with FG. Great impact for the ecosystem.  
Thanks for all of your hard work with this. It made a difference.






bfeld



Super feedback. 
Re: the Network – that’s interesting and I hadn’t considered that.








jkostecki



Hi Brad and thank you and Seth for the analysis. How did you guys go about doing due diligence on the companies you invested in? I understand that your selection criteria was based on a thesis and experience, but what other steps did you take to not only choose among the 700k startups listed on Angel List (of course not all of them are raising) and then once you decided to consider the investment how did you vet the teams and the startups themselves?






bfeld



It varied a lot but broke down into roughly three categories.
1. We knew the founders already and had some relationship.
2. We had a relationship with one of the lead angels who had done a lot of work already.
3. Random – and we had to do a new diligence process.
1 and 2 were the majority of the investments we made.








Sean



Interesting experiment – thanks for sharing the results with us all. Curious to hear what AngelList’s response to this was? Have they been begging you to stay or simply accept it as over right away?






bfeld



Naval is a total gem and his team is excellent. I sent him this post to review and he said “Looks balanced and thoughtful Brad, thanks for running the experiment with us.” 
He also had some other hypotheses about who / what situations with VCs AngelList would work more effectively in.
I have enormous respect for Naval and hope to have more opportunities to do things with him.








Pete Griffiths



Very interesting.  Thanks.






Rich Weisberger



Seems like you could have used one slack across all the investments to limit your time commitment? 






bfeld



Nope – Slack would have never worked effectively for this. The nature of the syndicate is very dynamic since individual angels can invest in whichever companies they want. So it’s a complex many-to-many relationship with us in the middle. Email doesn’t work effectively either.






Rich Weisberger



Oh I see. I thought the problem was dealing with communications between the sydicate lead and the portfolio companies. 






bfeld



Nope. AngelList does that very well.












James Green, Drowning Worms



Very interesting Brad. It’s interesting that a VC found it hard to build a network of angels. I know, as an angel, it’s also hard to build a network of VCs (perhaps also due to limited time, but on both sides). There’s clearly a willingness and appetite for some kind of angel-VC introduction service. If you find something that fits the bill, please share it. If I come up with something, I’ll message you somehow! All the best and thanks for the info.






bfeld



I thought more of the Angels would be proactive about developing a relationship with us. That was an incorrect assumption on my part.








William Mougayar



re: #3 “we have been disappointed in how we have – or haven’t – been effective at building a broader network of angel investors.”
– my guess is that the AL tools that “aren’t there” relate to potentially some CRM of sorts that could interweave all these angels into a manageable relationship management?






bfeld



Correct. We thought about trying a few different approaches but given the dynamic nature of the syndicate and who participates in each deal, this didn’t make sense to do outside of AngelList.








pointsnfigures



Cool that you are being so transparent about it.  What I am curious about is off all the investments, how many have raised another round?  Did they do traditional VC-or did they raise it on Angel List?  How many failed fast? Too soon to ask about exits.  
My own experience/perception of Angel List is that if a company wants to raise money, they need to have raised some prior to listing on Angel List.  They also should have a name lead investor.  
Angel List is a great development and there are a lot of other platforms trying to follow them.  On the flip side, it gets seed stage companies the capital they need, but not necessarily the mentorship guidance they need.  (Based on your and other experiences I have heard)






bfeld



It’s too early to analyze the outcome data. Many of the companies are still in the round they raised, a few have failed, a decent number have raised another round, and one has been acquired. We’ll do an analysis at some point in the future – but probably in another year or two.






pointsnfigures



Makes sense.  Huge respect to you for putting it out there as transparently as you have.










Mike Porath



Brad, thanks for experimenting with FG Angels. Your investment in The Mighty gave us the time to focus on doing what we needed to do to raise the next round. Happy to be a very small part of Foundry’s portfolio.






bfeld



Thanks – and our pleasure. We look forward to continuing to help!








Eric Ver Ploeg



Huge admiration for you guys in trying this experiment. Of course, most experiments don’t pan out, but getting in early and learning as much as you can, is way better than sitting back and watching.






bfeld



Yup – it’s the best way to learn!








James Routledge



We run the largest syndicate in Europe and I can definitely sympathise with you on points 1 and 3. 
1. AngelList is a great product but it is still buggy and lacking good UX. The legals and completion process is still messy and time consuming too. I don’t think they’ve taken the pain out of that yet. 
3. AL has good liquidity and a lot of investors on its platform, yet to form a relationship with a new investor and get them to actively fund your syndicate deals takes a lot of work. To do this still requires a face-to-face relationship. Fundamentally angels still invest with who they actually know, and most importantly trust. 
Thanks for sharing your learnings on it. 






Nick_Moran



Awesome post.  Sad to no longer see regular FG Angels deals!
While actively running the syndicate is no longer the right strategy for FG, what are your thoughts on benefits/drawbacks for individual angels investing via syndicates?






bfeld



I think it’s an awesome platform for that.








Alex Mathews



Thanks for the transparency, Brad.
In addition to hiring a potential VP/associate to run this, what about the added benefit of translating follow-on pro rata rights into special purpose vehicles via AL? In this case, the deal flow (originally not the intention of FG Angles) could become meaningful for your main FG LPs if given that exposure, no?






bfeld



I think this is going to be a curious debate over the next few years. I’m not convinced of the argument about soaking up all the pro-rata rights, especially at the early stages. And, it’s not important for us or our LPs as a fund since we (Foundry Group) certainly have the capability to do that from our main fund if we want.








lunarmobiscuit



Another experience that demonstrates how difficult it is to replace an experience based on trust with a seemingly more efficient process based online.  Thanks for sharing the details.
Meanwhile, two years ago, you were worrying about the 99 investor limit in the syndicate.  Was that ever actually an issue, and did you have to turn away some of those 416 investors in any of the deals?  Or did AngelList find a workaround?






bfeld



The 99 investor limit is and continues to be an issue.








Vineet



Thanks for the opportunity to invest with FG in the syndicates from the very beginning, it’s been great to see the wide array of companies and in a few cases I’ve been able to broker introductions for a few founders despite my very small stake.  
Given the deal flow volume, it was tough at times to keep up with even basic analysis of the investment opportunities as there often wasn’t a large enough lead time from announcement to closing (at least not enough for me).  If you delve into these waters again perhaps there is a way for active syndicate members to join a (secure, private) community discussion of the opportunities, contributing our expertise where applicable, before the deals reach a close. I think we’d all be able to accelerate our knowledge advancement this way.
If you even opt to pick up education / learning / edtech as a theme area and want a large company and startup perspective feel free to drop a line, helping would be the least I can do.
Thanks again and all the best for a great 2016 and beyond.






Tom George



I am the founder of a company and a first time CEO. I am here basically looking for advice on what to do with my company. Here is my situation. We are still in startup mode, however we are making money. I have always been an entrepreneur at heart, and I have managed to retain 100% percent of the company. I realize now in order to bring my vision to fruition, I am going to need the right team, and also some funding to get the company moving. Is this the purpose of seed funding? And if so, can someone please lead me in the right direction. I want to start taking the necessary steps to acquire the resources we need. Any advice is much appreciated.






Elena Borodina



It’s mind boggling and sad how much money is wasted on bad people and bad ideas. You could build so much more instead, and with less. In fact, having so much cash on hand, I don’t see how these angel investors and especially VCs don’t just bring all of this startup development in house. A solid working prototype of most of these startups would cost 25-50k, especially with a solid, trusted go-to team. You own all the equity, re-use back office, avoid startup mistakes, avoiding wasting money. Need Uber of X cashcows? Easy. Need Zero-to-One breakthroughs like Google’s algorithm? Invite tech geniuses who want to create rather than raise money and party in San Francisco. 
I only see upsides.






Patrick Foley



Sorry if this is a stupid question, but would it make more sense to “invest” in individual angels? Presumably you could limit to angels that fit a certain profile (low time sink, at minimum). You could magnify their impact on their portfolio companies and maybe get 1 in 100 great follow on investment. Outside of my world, but I’m just curious if that would work.















  Twitter Facebook LinkedIn Google+ 




















 




The 99 Investor Problem - Feld Thoughts





















































































 

















Press enter to search
 

Archive
Marathons
Books
About
Legal
 
Back to Top





January 22, 2014
The 99 Investor Problem


When the JOBS Act was finalized, one of the rule changes that had a lot of fanfare around it was the increase in the number of shareholders a private company could have. Prior to the JOBS Act, it was 500, after which point the company had to register and report to the SEC just like it was a public company (even if it hadn’t gone public.) This was a major issue for many fast growing companies that either went through strange contortions not to have 500 investors, or filed with the SEC to get no-action letters. There were plenty of nuances around this rule and I was in the middle of several situations that structured around it legally. Each time it was a lot of overhead for the company in question, none of which added anything to the system except fees to the lawyers.
Lifting the number of investors to 2000 seemed to make sense. In the situations I was involved in it would have immediately solved the specific problem. So that’s good.
But ever since we started working with AngelList on FG Angels, we’ve been wrestling with something called we’ve been referring to as the 99 Investor Problem. We structure our investment in companies via an LLC that has all the individual FG Angels syndicate members in it. This simplifies life for the company as they only end up with 1 investor – the FG Angels syndicate LCC – rather than a bunch of individual investors. At this point we have 217 backers in our syndicate, so with us each company would end up having 218 separate investors if we didn’t use the LLC.
If everyone was on the cap table, the company would have to chase down 218 signatures for everything. Instead, using our approach, they have effectively two investors – our FG Angels syndicate (one investor) and Foundry Group (another investor). Two signatures. Much easier. We handle the Foundry Group signature. AngelList handles the syndicate signature.
Except it doesn’t work that way. The SEC limits an LLC to having 99 investors. So we can only have 99 of the 217 syndicate members participate. Now, there’s a nuance that excludes “qualified purchasers” (QPs) – individuals with $5M in assets and firms with $25M in assets – from the 99 investor count. Overall our QPs + the top 99 investors in our syndicate represent $321,000 based on committed amounts to FG Angels. If you include the balance of the 237 members, we end up at a syndicate of $439,000. The company then gets our commitment of $50,000 on top of that.
As a result of this 99 investor limitation, we have two disappointing problems. First, we have over 100 investors who would like to invest in our syndicate with us who get excluded because of the 99 investor rule. Next, there is $118,000 per investment that we’d like to include in each syndicate that the companies we are investing in won’t get. Bad for the companies and bad for the investor.
We’ve spent lots of time over the past 60 days trying to solve the 99 investor problem. At this point, we’ve run into a dead end. We’ve tried multiple LLCs – that doesn’t work as they end up getting viewed as a single entity. We’ve tried other structures – that doesn’t work. We’re certainly open to ideas at this point.
In the mean time, until we solve this, AngelList is making the following changes to their Syndicates product.
– Qualified Purchasers: AngelList will include all Qualified Purchasers (individuals with $5M in assets and firms with $25M in assets) in each syndicated deal as they are exempt from the SEC’s 99-investor limit. We will soon email your backers to determine if they are Qualified Purchasers (QPs) and we will update your syndicate management interface to indicate the QPs.
– Top 99 Backers: The next time you syndicate a deal, we will include all QPs and the top 99 non-QPs by commitment amount. You can override this default to include specific backers who are not in the top 99. The top 99 backers will change dynamically as backers adjust their backing amounts.
– Funds: We are working on new funds products to allow additional investors who are not in your top 99 backers or QPs to participate in your syndicated deals.
– Notifying Backers: Finally, we will notify your backers of the SEC’s 99-investor restriction this week and give them the opportunity to change their backing amounts.
We are bummed about this because part of our goal is to build a very large angel network as a result of the FG Angels activity. The 99 investor rule directly undermines this, and limits the amount of investment and support for the companies we are investing in. It’s another example of the challenges of the JOBS Act and another discovery on our part of the “miss” between the goal of the new law and the implementation.










Sean Killeen



[disclaimer: I know next to nothing about these aspects of business, and am purely spitballing, so apologies if this is unworkable] A thought: instead of splitting up the investors into groups, could you split up what they’re investing in into groups? If you have ~300 investors, could you create three entities for them to invest in that are all controlled by the syndicate, which would allow 99 per? Trying to turn the problem on its head to see if it makes more sense to shuffle things around on the flip side.






jasonmendelson



the SEC is too smart for that and will consider them as one entity.  Sigh…..








David Brooks



Very interesting. I would assume this will lead to a small number of very large syndicates. Hopefully AngelList creates enough transparency among smaller investors so that they know where they stack up in a syndicate, and have flexibility to move to others with less backing. But will investors do that, or is the idea of a superstar lead too compelling?






jasonmendelson



Trying to post again…. I agree with your take.  Large syndicates will need to have higher investing followers.  No idea what investors will do, but it’s a serious bummer that we can’t truly have crowdfunding here.








JLM



.
Potential solution:
Investors form GP or LP with unlimited number of investors and with conditions determined by investors en masse.   This effectively mirrors the AngelList syndicate rules.  You are effectively moving the AngelList rules upstream.
GP or LP forms LLC with a single managing member and the GP or LP as other member.
LLC — with single managing member and GP or LP member — joins AngelList as investment vehicle.
New LLC makes investments and complies with all SEC/JOBS Act and AngelList rules.
Variation on theme:  Each investment uses a mirror image but “one off” LLC in order not to commingle different investments.  This would also be a bit of legal insurance against spill over legal liability.
JLM
.






Millie Tadewaldt



Good ideas. The issue here is that the SEC is too smart for that 🙂 and it “looks through” all investment vehicles that are formed specifically for the purpose of buying the same portfolio company, counting all of the individual investors in those special purpose vehicles against the investor limit. 
It is possible for form a more “fund-like” investment vehicle that deploys capital across multiple deals without triggering the look-through.








DaveJ



Have you looked into setting it up as a mutual fund?






jasonmendelson



We haven’t because as mutual fund managers, we’d be liable to all of the syndicate members if we chose bad investors.  Our investors in the our main venture funds would not allow this and we are generally scared of lawyers.  (Which is why I stopped looking in mirrors long ago).






Joe Wallin



DaveJ–cost of being a mutual fund is prohibitive. So, it is not a practical solution.








Brett Topche



It’s an issue for small traditional funds as well. Depending on which SEC exemption you use to raise your fund, you are typically limited to 99 LPs. Not an issue for larger funds with fewer, larger institutional commitments, but for smaller funds raised primarily from high net worth individuals, it can be a pain in the ass. Also, from the company standpoint, if the LLC is formed solely for the purpose of investing in that company (i.e. your syndicate forms a new LLC for each investment, which seems likely given that the syndicate changes over time), all of the investors in the LLC count towards their 2,000 limit. Not necessarily a huge deal for one syndicate investing in a company, but if you have a couple of syndicates involved, even though you only have to chase down one signature, you can start eating into your 2,000.






jasonmendelson



Agreed.








tubby_bartles



This issue is more difficult than other AngelList issues. Elsewhere, AngelList is meeting the spirit of the law, but needed to find a clever way to meet the letter of the law as well given the new technologies.
In this case, the spirit of the 99 investor rule is to prevent large number of investors from acting as a coordinated group without “being public”. So the SEC has had many, many years to plug every possible letter-of-the-law loophole.
The specific legal language doesn’t refer to funds – it refers to “organized groups” and the SEC considers that to mean they look through any legal structure you pick to see whether the group is organized as a single group or not.
Splitting investments (into parallel funds or by groups of “upstream” funds as suggested in the comments here) is already said by the SEC to count all investors. 
I suspect this one may need a law change to address.






jasonmendelson



I agree.  The integration issues that SEC makes part of  the issue kills us.  Perhaps a no-action letter is due?






Sean Schantzen



Have you found a way that a no action letter could help with this? The limit comes from the Investment Company Act and is in the statute itself (which I don’t think a no action letter could change). I don’t know anyway around it without running into integration issues (maybe a creative no action letter that addresses just integration, since integration isn’t in the statute, but the SEC would really have to be on board with syndicates). We’ve been trying to find a work around for this too, but came to the same conclusions. If someone goes down the no action letter road, we’d be happy to be involved and help out.






jasonmendelson



I haven’t found a way, it’s just a theory.  If the SEC won’t bust us, we are clean but this is a very broad topic that a no action letter might not work for.






Sean Schantzen



Thanks. The whole 99 investor limit seems like a relic just like the 500 investor reporting limit. It would be great to at least increase it by the same 4x the 500 investor limit was, regardless of whether by no action letter or statute change.






jasonmendelson



agreed














DL



JLM outlined the direction SproutrHouse is looking for a solution. Brad, where has this path led you?
Since Angel List began offering Syndicates, I have been working to solve a variation of this problem to serve early-stage companies privately at SproutrHouse. SproutrHouse offers natural CPG brands a simple crowd funding solution but it’s a $125-$400k investment that the market is seeking and one SproutrHouse is well-suited to address.






jasonmendelson



We’ve actually only been led to the ideas that Brad describes above.  I have a feeling we are headed toward a request for a SEC no-action letter, but the issue might be too broad and need legislative action.








Carlos



Does a Series LLC work?  Not available in Cali, but who wants to do business there anyway 😉 #stackexchange.  I am exploring using a series LLC in a novel way to promote investment into a core technology, where each individual “app” of this core technology could be its own company.  Separates investors, liability, minimizes paperwork, and above all fees right?  Would this be something you guys would entertain in funding in my case? Hoping that this could be useful in this case as well.  This afterall was given birth via the mutual fund industry, per wikipedia:    https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Series_LLC






jasonmendelson



Well, unfortunately we need to be able to do business in CA, so no.  And if you make the company split up like that you get pass through taxes to the investors which doesn’t work, either.  Thanks for the idea!








JMN



If section 3(c)(1) is not amended, the 100 investor
limit could severally undermine the JOBS Act’s on several levels. The accredited
investor verification requirements, as defined by the JOBS Act, should be
sufficient foundation to argue a 2,000 investor cap – in line with the max. number
of AI’s a private company can introduce as shareholders. A no-action letter may
work if the SEC’s fully aware its efforts surrounding the JOBS Act could be
vein.






bfeld



Yup. It feels like one possible solution is a no-action letter, but this ultimately is a one-off per organization (e.g. AngelList) so it doesn’t really solve the overall problem.






JMN



Although a one-off result, the outcome would set a precedent assisting other organizations, startups, small investors. The other option is a collective effort to force an amendment to section 3(c)(1). If common sense prevailed, the upside benefits far outweigh the downside risk if the investor cap was increased in line with allowable shareholders (letting companies decide the weighting) subject to AI’s being certified pursuant to Title II.










riverland



could this be relevant or helpful? https://verifyinvestor.com/






bfeld



Sort of. AngelList is doing this for free however – see https://www.feld.com/archives/2014/01/angellist-accreditation-report.html






Jor Law



Hi, Co-founder of VerifyInvestor.com and AngelList fan here.  What we do is similar to what AngelList provides, but they have a limited use case while ours is a more reliable and comprehensive solution.  Their solution is great for their platform, I think, but ours is something that can be relied upon by companies, their advisors/professionals and investors who need certainty of compliance.






Jor Law



Somehow my other post got removed, but I did want to add that https://verifyinvestor.com doesn’t currently address the Investment Company Act and 100 invest limit issue.  It’s more a solution relating to general solicitation and 506(c).










ObjectMethodology.com



Sounds like we need an “OWNERSHIP Act”? Something that let’s people in the US (a country based on freedom) be free to do as they please.






Scott



Welcome to my world, Brad.  The Company Act and the investor slot issues are a real pain in the ass.  As you’ve discovered, if you structure your vehicles as 3(c)7 vehicles by including only QPs, you’ll be ok.  It’s actually pretty easy.  If you must accommodate accredited investors, look into Registered Investment Company (“RIC”) structures.  A closed end RIC (essentially a ’40 Act, closed-end mutual fund structure) allows you to aggregate accredited investor capital in a private vehicle.  It’s not a free lunch – you’ll need to be registered, have an independent board, have third-party admin, etc.  On the plus side, its fairly permanent capital (liquidity with gating), is flexible, and offers the ability to reinvest proceeds or dividend out proceeds, and is well traveled ground.  You should look into it.  There is a cost, but if the money you’re aggregating is big enough, it could make sense.






bfeld



Yup – we know this well – and have no interest in going down this path. That’s not – in our mind – the goals of the JOBS Act, nor is it how we approach our world in general, which is why (a) we’ve never done this sort of thing in the past and (b) we are intrigued and excited about the ground AngelList is plowing.








Felix Dashevsky



This issue arises because you are (double-) pooling investors.  Given the electronic/easy nature of AngelList closing process, I question the need for a separate syndicate LLC.  Let the investors invest directly into Startups. And play with Startup funding docs to ensure streamlined future interaction with investors (or use power of attorney, advisory contract, or solve it technologically).   
The issue such direct structure would highlight is your (and AngelList’s) fee.  However, I think you can structure around it (options/warrants at OpCo, investment advisory contract, something else creative).  If it is an advisory contract, you’ll run into Investment Advisory Act and “qualified client” issues…  but frankly I am not sure how you (or AngelList) have avoided these so far.






bfeld



If I was on the startup side, I wouldn’t want this. Regardless of the legal docs, there will be at least one situation where you have to chase down signatures and that could be the nightmare.
We’ve focused very hard on the legal dynamics around IAA and are very comfortable, but really understanding it has been non-trivial.






Felix Dashevsky



But isn’t that what the JOBS Act was about?  Like the 2000 limit you alluded to in the opening paragraph (“a lot of fanfare around […] the increase in the number of shareholders a private company could have”).  Or the crowdfunding bits.  It wasn’t about broader access to fund-like structures, but to startups.  If startups want just a couple of big investors… well, we don’t need the JOBS Act at all.  If we step back, nothing we are discussing was in fact affected by the JOBS Act–FG Angels is using the “old” 506(b) pathway.






bfeld



Since we are using 506(b), you are correct. Which means that the JOBS acts is not accomplishing the goal!






Felix Dashevsky



Which was what?






Felix Dashevsky



My point is that neither the JOBS Act, nor any other rule on startup fundraising is causing any issue here.  The “99-problem” is not endemic to startup investing (like the “500-problem” is).






bfeld



I guess I just disagree. If you’ve been following what we’ve tried to do with FG Angel, it’s very much about democratizing startup investing, and the 99 investor rule is a huge disconnect from the JOBS Act goals, especially in raising the private investor cap from 500 to 2000.






Felix Dashevsky



Fair enough.  I am following FG Angel by backing it.  Although not sure if I will make it into the 99 the next time!






JMN



Brad, I concur with your position. The question is what can be done to resolve this hurdle? There’s always a solution. Jason Best and team at Crowdfund Capital Advisors (https://crowdfundcapitaladvisors.com/about-us/our-team/jason-best.html), may be a starting point.






JMN



It appears my previous comment was removed because a link to a third party’s website was included? A private company found on the net that was involved with pushing the JOBS Act legislation through. My point was there’s sure to be a solution to this problem. But it’s going to take some digging and talking to the right people who can push for change at the legislative level. Otherwise, the “99 investor problem” is here to stay, there’s no way around it.














Eddie Wharton



Could you have a 99 person Brad-FG Angels LLC, another 99 person Jason-FG Angels LLC, etc.? Instead of combining them off the cap table just include 3 different LLC’s. It would be a bit more work, is not a scalable solution past a certain point and relies enormously on the trust that you have built to make sure all of the FG Angel LLC make the exact same investments with the same terms.  
This is not an effective solution for everybody and one part of the law seems to undermine the spirit of another.  Big picture, that needs to be fixed. However, this could be a way to keep FG Angels growing and still have a low single digit number of additions to the cap table.






jasonmendelson



I wish.  SEC would look into “who is Brad / Jason” and realize we are partners and then game over.  They integrate and we are “done”






Joe Wallin



I think we ought to just repeal the investment company act…










Steve Consilvio



Stop investing and give your money away!
I love it how rich prigs think they are helping others by lending them money and then sucking the blood out of a new business. You guys should be ashamed of yourselves.






Fred Destin



My personal view is that we do this one step at a time and prove we are responsible actors on a functional platform.  The 99 investor problem could also refer to 1999 when retail investors were left holding cats in bags prepared for them by professional investors.  Let’s build a strong platform with good diligence tools, social signals, evidence of track record and then go back and propose the next regulatory evolution.  I am convinced there is a day where crowdfunding will apply to startups as it applies to products on Kickstarter, but we need to make sure it’s done well.  Let’s celebrate the deregulation, demonstrate our platform works, and then fight for the next step.






bfeld



Fair enough. 
However, when the 500 shareholder limit was raised to 2,000, I don’t think anyone was paying attention to the 99 LLC rule. If there was thoughtful discussion about it, that’s cool. But my instinct is that there wasn’t. And that’s what’s frustrating / disappointing to me.
I think the gang at AngelList was just as surprised by this based on all of our work together. Since you are investors directly in AngelList, realizing that their initial view was there was no problem having larger syndicates is probably important as part of understanding how this all evolves.
As we planned from the beginning, the FG Angels experiment is just that – an experiment – so we are happy to find all the limitations, edge cases, and problems. I don’t think our behavior or performance is – or should be – a proxy for regulators as we are merely one data point, so I’m happy to be public about all the challenges we run into.








Steven Kane



Hi Brad. Re the chasing signatures issue. Couldnt the startup simply require angels who invest directly to submit to some kind of “drag along” right? Meaning, once the angel’s money is invested, no signatures are ever required ever again?






bfeld



Possibly. It’s one of the approaches we’ve looked at. We – and some of the companies we’ve talked to – aren’t comfortable with it since it still ends up with a huge number of individual investors on the cap table.








lunarmobiscuit



The Investment Act and SEC seems to have thought through every straightforward workaround.  Given that, it seems the best path is to go back and questions the assumptions.  You set up this LLC to: (a) simplify the paperwork for the investees, (b) centralize the decision making  of the syndicate, (c) prove out the AngelList crowdfunding model.
Of these, only (a) is limited by the rules.  I saw in the comments that the rules don’t allow you to run one LLC and any of your Foundry partners to run a second LLC.  But what stops any of the other 216 people in the syndicate from setting up a second LLC?  A “Not-FG Angels LLC”, whose manager receives no communications from you, but who watches AngelList to see what FG Angels invests in and follows along.
You pick 98 others to be part of FG Angels, and someone from the other 119 others not picked can choose 98 more for Not-FG Angels LLC, and so on with Truly-Not-FG Angels, until you hit the 2,000 investor limit, which I believe really has no workaround.






bfeld



That’s a valid hack and certainly open to anyone who wants to do it.






rxdxt



This is Richard Titus, founder of Prompt.ly (Foundry Syndicate investment 2) -chiming in… I agree this is a real problem. Prompt.ly was super excited about the opportunity & the democratic innovation in investment – but we were surprised the final investment amount was so much lower than commitments. (it all worked out as we were significantly oversubscribed via direct investment.) 
Perhaps syndicates could “back each other up”?  i.e. each syndicate could act as a “sub-manager” to investors who are interested in a deal, but cannot fit into the 1st 198 investors of the original syndicator?  I’d be happy to serve in this capacity for Foundry.
It should be noted we (and I hope you don’t mind we did this) “picked off” some of the obviously QP investors and invited them to invest directly to allow more people into the deal – but until the SEC & IRS solve this that seemed the best way to preserve access. – to our view the purpose of Angellist is to level the playing field for investors – particularly smaller ones and diversify the investment landscape. 
Based on my fantastic experience as an entrepreneur being backed by Foundry & it’s syndicate – I’ve started my own!  
Thanks again!






bfeld



We’re glad you picked off additional QP investors to invest directly. All good…










Henry Glover



What if the 217 members pooled together to form a firm with $25m in assets making one “qualified purchaser”  Might be silly for one deal but if you had a lot of people in a “firm” it basically makes the firm a really large syndicate.  Im guessing it would require either bigger checks, more people + a lot of deals for it to scale… vc firm






bfeld



That won’t work as the entity will have > 99 investors.








Scott Kosch



Brad, I’m in your syndicate and make the 99 cut-off because of my per-deal amount, but I also qualify as a QP.  Just got around to getting a letter from a financial institution to attest to this, but in the online form it also mentions that they might periodically run my credit history.  I don’t like the idea of having my credit run frequently (like possibly for every deal or even a few times per year), because this negatively impacts credit scores (which I think is crazy).  Can you say anything about this?  I hate to fill an accredited spot, when I could be included as a QP, but the periodic credit check gave me pause.






bfeld



I don’t know the answer to this specifically but will check.






Scott Kosch



Brad, thanks for asking AL about this.  Here is what I learned, so that others don’t shy away from validating their QP status.  The credit check they perform is called a “soft pull.”  Add your own joke to that.  It does not impact your credit score, unlike a “hard pull.”  Nevertheless, if you still want to avoid this repeated credit check for each deal, there are two ways AL may not need to check as frequently.  First, if you invest through an entity, which is wholly-owned by one or more QPs, then that entity is a QP, and they shouldn’t need to run your credit personally. Second, if you can verify that your Net Worth is greater than $5M and not just your Net Assets (i.e., your Net Worth would be less debt and other liabilities), then credit checks aren’t necessary.  Anyway, happy that I can make room for one more investor by changing my status.








TejDhawan



That’s an interesting observation. You’re correct that the credit score would likely by hit by the credit check. The credit report would generally affirm the salary based qualification requirements, but not the remaining 8 or 9, as financial assets, non-profit work, institutional mgmt etc. don’t make it into credit checks. The criminal/bankruptcy items that do make it into credit checks would apply to the companies raising the funding through FG Angels+syndicate.
Interesting question to send to AL directly as well, and this is making me think that the company raising the funds should also be providing representations that they clear the ‘bad actor disqualification’ test.

















  Twitter Facebook LinkedIn Google+ 




















 




Syndicate Funding on AngelList – A Company’s Perspective / 






























































				Hi, I'm Seth Levine, a Boulder, CO based technology investor and managing director at Foundry Group. While I love technology I’m also a husband, father, avid cyclist, snowboarder and outdoors guy.			







 

















Press enter to search
 

Archive
About
Legal
 
Back to Top





May 21, 2014
Syndicate Funding on AngelList – A Company’s Perspective


A few months ago AngelList announced Syndicates – enabling investors on AngelList to create fund-like groups of investors to invest together in AngelList companies (following a single lead investor). It’s a great idea and at Foundry we quickly decided it would be an interesting experiment to form our own syndicate. We were the first formal venture fund to do this. Since then we’ve completed about 10 deals (I say “about” because we have a few things in various stages of completion as I write this – the intent of FG Angels is to make 50 AngelList investments – about 1 per week).
We often get asked how the process works and while what’s below has specifics about working with FG Angels it also contains some great advice for anyone raising money on AngelList in general, and through Syndicates specifically. I’ve edited the text and added some things of my own, but this is largely the work of Carrie Requist, CEO of UGrokit, a company we recently funded through FG Angels.

How AngelList Syndicates (and FG Angels) Works

It’s important to understand that AngelList syndicates work somewhat like an opportunity fund, where AngelList investors sign up to “follow” a syndicate and pledge to invest a certain amount of money. The key here is that this isn’t a hard commitment – each syndicate member makes a deal by deal decision to invest. As a result the syndicate size isn’t the total amount of money you’ll raise – it’s the maximum you’ll raise from the syndicate. And depending on how many members there are to the syndicate and what crowdfunding exemption you use (more on that below) the actual limit will likely be quite a bit less than the total you see next to the syndicate name on AngelList. And, of course, it will also require some work on your part to pull syndicate members into your actual deal. Syndicates aren’t automatic capita – you’ll still need to work for your money.
There are 2 parts to the FG Angels or any AngelList Syndicate investment:

Foundry Group (or your syndicate leader) invests their portion – in FG Angels case this is $50,000
In parallel they open the investment to their syndicate members on AngelList

AngelList shows for each syndicate the amount that the syndicate leader will invest and the amount pledged by all the syndicate members as a whole (shown as “backed by” on AngelList). At the time of FG Angels investment in U Grok It, their syndicate total was $426k (that total excludes the FG Angels portion).
It’s worth reiterating that unlike a mutual fund, the investors are not committed to investing in every company that any syndicate backs, so the $426k from the members of FG Angels represents the maximum investment if every member decided to contribute (and again, as a practical matter given the number of members in the syndicate and the exemptions that AngelList relies upon to fund these syndicates the actual maximum is below this number). Members have not given any money to AngelList or FG Angels for the syndicate and ultimately, the investor must make their own decision on each deal and then transfer money on a deal by deal basis.  Many things can effect your actual deal participation including how many deals the syndicate has completed, the pace of the syndicate’s investments, the type of investment (ie., note or equity), the stage of the company, how much the company is raising, specific deal terms, and members personal preferences.
U Grok It was actively raising on a convertible note and had already closed a portion of it, so we already had terms in place. Foundry reviewed these terms before committing to invest and both FG Angel’s $50k and the syndicate member’s total amount are under the terms of this note. This means we did not negotiate deal terms with Foundry or with AngelList, the investors accepted the terms we already had for the convertible note (or choose not to invest). There are syndicate deals where the lead investor does negotiate terms (Foundry does this on other FG Angel deals) but syndicate members don’t – they either accept the terms or don’t participate. And they do look at terms so structuring a fair deal is important.
Syndicate Dynamics:
To sign up for FG Angels, an investor must be approved by Foundry Group and agree to their terms, which include a carry. The carry is a percentage of the returns on the investment that the investor will give to Foundry Group for managing the syndicate and investments (note that AngelList itself takes a carry as well). The carry is between Foundry Group and the investor and has no direct impact on the AngelList company. This is beneficial to the startup because neither AngelList nor Foundry Group take any of the investment funds -there is no “finders fee” or other fee to the startup for being part of the syndicate. FG Angels and AngelList will get their carry straight from the syndicate investors upon an exit. The terms for being a syndicate member and the specific carry vary between syndicates, but the key for founders here is that this is all taken care of outside of any specific investment and any investor listed as part of the syndicate will have already agreed to the terms and carry.
The AngelList syndicate shows the number of members in FG Angels and lists each syndicate member as well as the amount they have pledged per investment. There is a portion of syndicate members who rarely invest in any deals and some who invest in every deal. A smaller group performs due diligence on each deal before they invest and makes a deal by deal decision whether or not to participate.
The Timing:
FG Angels Syndicate investments go FAST. Foundry committed to invest through FG Angels on a Friday. Over the weekend we revised our note and updated our AngelList profile. On Monday our deal went live and almost all the funds raised from the FG Angles syndicate were in process by the following Monday (within one week).
Be Ready for the Syndicate Investment to go Live on AL:
FG Angels is a popular and fast moving syndicate with 219 members at the time of the U Grok It investment – with an explicit goal to launch a new investment each week. This means that the interest in your startup will shoot up as soon as the FG Angels investment goes live on AngelList. Here is a graph of the investor views on U Grok It’s AngelList profile over the two weeks that the FG Angels Syndicate investment was live:
The first short bar is the Monday it went live (we launched towards the end of the day). The big spike is Tuesday. What this means for an AngelList company is – be completely ready for investors before giving FG Angels the green light to go live.
506(b) vs 506(c):
These refer to two of the SEC rules that regulate “crowdfunding” financing. 506(c) is the new Jobs Act provision that, in part, allows for what’s called a general solicitation (on AngelList, this is shown as a “public” fundraising). FG Angels Syndicate investments are NOT general solicitations and some syndicate members do not want to invest in companies that are using this exemption. Check with your lawyer to make sure you have not engaged in general solicitation and make sure you DO NOT CLICK on the AngelList button that says “Activate” under “Raise Online On Your Own.” (this can’t be undone, so make sure you’re careful about this step). Your AngelList company profile shows “Investors Only” in the upper right under Fundraising if you are 506(b), which is likely you want (this isn’t legal advice – talk to your lawyer about the pros and cons about the various exemptions but understand that, broadly speaking, few institutional investors will ever invest in your company if you use the new broad solicitation rules – they simply don’t work as intended (yet).
What the FG Angels Syndicate Wants to See:
Closing an investment is just another form of closing a sale for your company. Investors just have a different pain they are trying to solve – they want a big return on their investment. Make sure your investor messaging is clear on this in your AngelList profile. Be sure to have your profile polished. For example, you’ll want:

Video of your deck – if you have a good quality video of yourself presenting your deck, great. If not, record your audio and put that with your slides. We did this in house (the production quality does not have to be stellar, just clear) and put it as an unlisted video on YouTube. You can then put the link in AL.
Product demo video
Product shots / screen shots
Every part of your profile completed
Current investors and total investment amount for this round. AngelList will show how much you are raising and how much is left in the raise, so make sure the numbers are up to date by updating each closed investor prior to launch
AngelList comments and references for both your company and the founders. If you don’t have these, ask for them. Your networking should have brought you into contact with many people who are rooting for you – this is a way they can help you without investing money. We had some high profile supporters who gave us comments just before the investment went live and this was a big help
Your website – Make sure your website is up to date because the FG Angels Syndicate members will go from AngelList right to your website to see what your customer messaging looks like and how you position your business.

What Happens After the FG Angels Syndicate Investment Goes Live:
You will have a lot of fundraising work to do in the week after the investment goes live. Members start to make reservations in the investment – you’ll see that is shown in the activity for both FG Angels and your company on AngelList. Members can also increase the amount they want to invest in your company. Members can also withdraw or cancel from the investment.
AngelList will show your company as having raised the total backing amount of the syndicate (which is overstated for the reasons already discussed) and separately show the total backing amount + FG Angels $50k. These are shown on your company’s Stats page > Fundraising > Manage > Overview. This total will initially be the full backing amount of the FG Angels Syndicate and will go down slowly as members withdraw (yes, slightly disheartening). Remember that this will be a good investment both from the funds standpoint and by having Foundry Group’s support.
Note that most FG Angels members will neither reserve nor withdraw. Your company will also get a lot of follows (mostly from FG Angels syndicate members) and a lot of request for intros. You should follow everyone who follows you and have a message prepared to send to each one. U Grok It’s message thanked them for following, invited them to watch the pitch deck and demo videos and to contact us with any questions, giving direct contact information. Also reply to each request for intro and expect these people to email you back, usually with questions. The request for intros are often investors who do more diligence about the investment. Some followers and request for intros are from investors who are not members of the FG Angels Syndicate, but watch what the syndicate does to find new investments. Plan that most of the your week after the FG Angels Syndicate investment goes live will be spent courting AngelList investors.
In our case, we were also contacted by people who follow FG Angels or one of the Foundry partners but who are not part of the FG Angels syndicate. These people can become outside investors (we are still conversing with a few that may be interested in our Series A round). Some syndicate members may also wish to invest directly in addition to their participation in the syndicate. U Grok It has a new investor in this round who has a small amount in the FG Angels syndicate, but is investing substantially more directly (this is a bit of an end around Foundry, so be careful here who you let in and whether they’re trying to simply piggback on FG Angels w/o paying the carry associated with doing so or if they’re legitimately interested in participating in the syndicate and so excited they want to invest more). So don’t discount a syndicate member just because their syndicate participation may be low. Also to this point, less than half of our syndicate investment came from investors at $5K or higher. The majority was at $2,500 or lower.
Closing the Investment:
At your direction, AngelList will begin to close the FG Angels investment. This will allow syndicate members to start transferring their investments into the fund (more on this below). AngelList will then select a closing date (about a week after you start closing). Our investment opened on Mon, March 24 and AngelList started closing on Wed, March 26 with an initial closing date of Tuesday, April 1.
Here is where you start to get an indication of how much you will actually raise from the FG Angels syndicate. Members will start transferring their investment and in the Stats > Fundraising > Manage > Manage page you will see the amount that has been collected (starts as $0) above a four-tabbed list: All, Not Started, Pending and Collected. In the “All” list, you will see only the members who have not previously opted out of the investment and then you will see some members cancel.You will see the pending amount increase and then the collected amount increase as the pending amount decreases (funds move from pending to collected). Starting to close doesn’t lock anyone out of the investment. Any member of the syndicate (even if they did not opt in, as most of them didn’t) can transfer their investment during this part of the closing. AngelList will send a message to the FG Angels members when the investment starts to close and another one a few days later reminding them to transfer their funds.
This is a great time to update the FG Angels Syndicate members in the Not Started group. If you ask AngelList, they will send you a spreadsheet of the members with their email addresses so you can do a group BCC: email with send you the link they need to click on to make their investment. Include some update on your company (in our case we received a new, glowing profile from a high profile AngelList member and we were opening our online sales). Come up with something to update them about. Make sure this email goes only to the Not Started group. AngelList is also generally happy to extend the closing date if your pending investments are still going up. We extended from April 1 to April 7, but the vast majority of the investment was in Pending by April 1. When investments slow or stop (in one to two weeks), AngelList will close the investment – this does keep members who have Not Started from joining the investment, but keeps things open until the pending investments have been received.
 The Investment Paperwork and Details
The FG Angels Syndicate investment is overseen by Foundry Group (for which they receive the carry if the investment generates a return). The company will have only two new investors: FG Angels and FG Angels Syndicate. The FG Angels Syndicate members who invest in your company become part of a fund setup by Foundry Group through Assure Fund Management. Someone from Assure will contact you after the FG Angels syndicate investment goes live on AngelList to set up your funding vehicle (this is separate from FG Angel’s direct $50k investment).
If you have filled your round and are closed, that is great. If you still have room in your round (we did since we had extended the round to ensure there was enough room for the FG Angels Syndicate), then you can keep raising.
CONGRATS – Now What? – Investor Relations with the Syndicate
Technically, you only have FG Angels and fund(s) managed by FG Angels as your investors. However, some syndicate members will want to connect with you directly (in our experience often on LinkedIn), some will ask for updates and some will offer their help (services, connections, advice).
This is evolving so there aren’t really any norms here yet. On the one hand, it is impossible for a small startup to effectively manage 100 new investors. On the other hand, these investors all now have a stake in your success and many are willing to help make that success happen, so they can be quite beneficial to your startup.
You can send updates to the syndicate investors as a group through AL in Stats > Fundraising > Manage > Manage where, once the deal is finalized, you will see a list of Closed investors and Didn’t Close and on the right a Message box with a link to “Update Investors or ask for advice.” These updates are only visible to you and your investors. We updated the investors when the round completely closes and plan on providing them major updates and perhaps a quarterly post while right now I send out a monthly (or so) email to our direct investors as well as field calls and make calls when there is a topic to discuss.
Hopefully this overview is helpful in gaining an understanding of the AngeList syndicate process in general and the FG Angels process in particular. Of course this is a new and therefore evolving method for funding your business so check for updates from AngelList (and here where we’ll post new developments).















  Twitter Facebook LinkedIn Google+ 




 













 











 




Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version












 

Fg Angel Syndicate Fund Iv A Series Of Fg Angel Syndicate Funds Llc raised $1,070,000 on July 24th, 2015































Want to see more?Want to find out who got funded, and who’s funding the next big thing? in real time? all across the world? tailored to your specific areas of focus?100+ deals per dayGet access to the most exhaustive worldwide funding watch on the web!Comprehensive funding informationKnow about who invested in a company, which sites covered the event, the funding history, etc.Exclusive insightsView original analytics such as most dynamic industries, most active investors, and more!Stay aware!Get emailed when deals critical to your business happen. Filter by region, industry and topics of interest.As seen onHave a login?Sign inRegister now!It's free!Use your social accountOr fill in the quick form:Register nowpromise we won't spamSign invia your social account:via your existing WGF account:Remember meRegister, it's freeForgot your password?SIGN INForgot your password?Enter your e-mail and we will send you your new password.reset passwordThe world's largest funding base/deals/359470-fg-angel-syndicate-fund-iv-a-series-of-fg-angel-syndicate-funds-llcsection=deals&subsection=detail&id=359470  




			Search deals by company name, industry, location, investors...			
			




SEARCH


Fg Angel Syndicate Fund Iv A Series Of Fg Angel Syndicate Funds Llc raised $1,070,000 on July 24th, 2015.Get alertedif Fg Angel Syndicate Fund Iv A Series Of Fg Angel Syndicate Funds Llc gets funded!Amount:$1,070,000Company:Fg Angel Syndicate Fund Iv A Series Of Fg Angel Syndicate Funds LlcInvestors:-Industry:FinanceCountry:State:City:United StatesCaliforniaSan FranciscoKey people:LLC AngelList Advisors, (Director) LLC Assure Fund Management, (Director) Jeremy Neilson (Executive Officer)Data sources:www.sec.gov - D - FG Angel Syndicate Fund IV, a series of FG Angel Syndicate Funds LLC (0001648763) (Filer)Description:Fg Angel Syndicate Fund Iv A Series Of Fg Angel Syndicate Funds Llc raised 1.1M in an investment round (2015-07-24). Fg Angel Syndicate Fund Iv A Series Of Fg Angel Syndicate Funds Llc is a Finance-specialized enterprise.Please note that all data is automatically extracted and errors can occur.The WhoGotFunded team has not necessarily reviewed the information in this page and has not determined if it is accurate and complete.Inaccurate Data? Help us improve WhoGotFunded: post a comment!

AngelList Advisors,  LLC - CEO, founder, businessman - profile

















directorpedia.net - List of CEOs, founders, board members and company directors











AngelList Advisors,  LLC
Check out list of companies and businesses related to AngelList Advisors,  LLC. Find out AngelList Advisors,  LLC address and contact details. View other people related to AngelList Advisors,  LLC - coworkers, colleagues, companions, etc.
Address:   

16 Maiden Lane Suite 600  San Francisco 94108 CA




Companies related to AngelList Advisors,  LLC
CIKCompany NamePositionCompany Address0001648763FG Angel Syndicate Fund IV, a series of FG Angel Syndicate Funds LLCPO BOX 171305  SALT LAKE CITY 841170001655025Naval Ravikant AL Fund I, LPPO BOX 171305  SALT LAKE CITY 841170001661319Jude Gomila AngelList Fund II, LPPO BOX 171305  SALT LAKE CITY 841170001662443Tikhon Bernstam AngelList Fund, LPPO BOX 171305  SALT LAKE CITY 841170001664339Rick Marini AngelList Fund, LPPO BOX 171305  SALT LAKE CITY 841170001666547Jude Gomila AngelList W16 Fund, LPPO BOX 171305  SALT LAKE CITY 84117




AngelList Advisors,  LLC on the Web
Persons related to AngelList Advisors,  LLC - FG Angel Syndicate Fund IV, a series of FG Angel Syndicate Funds LLCNamePositionCityNeilson  JeremySalt Lake CityAngelList Advisors,  LLCSan FranciscoAngelList Advisors,  LLCSan FranciscoLLC  Assure Fund Management,Salt Lake CityPersons related to AngelList Advisors,  LLC - Naval Ravikant AL Fund I, LPNamePositionCityBeyrich  JensSalt Lake CityAngelList Advisors,  LLCSan FranciscoLLC  Assure Fund Management,Salt Lake CityPersons related to AngelList Advisors,  LLC - Jude Gomila AngelList Fund II, LPNamePositionCityBeyrich  JensSalt Lake CityAngelList Advisors,  LLCSan FranciscoAngelList Advisors,  LLCSan FranciscoLLC  Assure Fund Management IV,Salt Lake CityPersons related to AngelList Advisors,  LLC - Tikhon Bernstam AngelList Fund, LPNamePositionCityBeyrich  JensSalt Lake CityAngelList Advisors,  LLCSan FranciscoLLC  Assure Fund Management IV,Salt Lake CityPersons related to AngelList Advisors,  LLC - Rick Marini AngelList Fund, LPNamePositionCityBeyrich  JensSalt Lake CityAngelList Advisors,  LLCSan FranciscoAngelList Advisors,  LLCSan FranciscoLLC  Assure Fund Management,Salt Lake CityPersons related to AngelList Advisors,  LLC - Jude Gomila AngelList W16 Fund, LPNamePositionCityBeyrich  JensSalt Lake CityAngelList Advisors,  LLCSan FranciscoAngelList Advisors,  LLCSan FranciscoAngelList Advisors,  LLCSan FranciscoLLC  Assure Fund Management,Salt Lake CityLLC  Assure Fund Management IV,Salt Lake City












 








Help - AngelList





















































Join
 
Log In







AngelList


Startup Jobs

Recruit

Invest

More





Companies

Freelancers

Incubators

Track

Salaries
Valuations

Help











Your Alumni Network








Companies

Freelancers

Incubators

Track

Salaries
Valuations

Help




























General

Edit



Startups

Edit



Jobs

Edit



A-List: Candidates

Edit



A-List: Companies

Edit



Track

Edit



Connections

Edit



Public Fundraising

Edit



Investors

Edit



Accreditation Reports

Edit



Syndicates

Edit



Investor Accounts

Edit



Funds

Edit



Firms & Accelerators

Edit



Contact

Edit



Europe

Edit



Mobile Jobs App

Edit



Direct

Edit







All
/
Syndicates





What is a syndicate?



A syndicate allows investors to participate in a lead investor's deals. In exchange, investors pay the lead carry.Here's an example: Sara, a notable angel investor, decides to lead a syndicate. The syndicate investors agree to invest $200K total in each of her future deals and pay her 15% carry.When Sara makes her next investment, she offers to invest $250K in the company. She personally invests $50K and offers the remaining $200K to her syndicate.If the investment is successful, the syndicate investors first receive their $200K, after which every dollar of the syndicate’s profit is split 80% to the syndicate investors, 15% to Sara and 5% to AngelList Advisors.  AngelList Advisors is a venture capital exempt reporting advisor with the Securities and Exchange Commission, and a subsidiary of AngelList.View syndicates »

Link to this
·
Updated Jun 02, 2016








What are the benefits of syndicates?



Investors get access to deals, leads get carry and startups get more capital with fewer meetings.Investors get access to a lead's investments and benefit from her experience in picking and managing investments. Investors can also invest as little as $1K.Leads get carry for their investments. They can invest 5–10x their typical investment amount, which gives them access to more deals and allows them to lead more deals. They may also get major investor rights. Finally, leads get access to syndicate investors who are often experts in the startup’s market.Startups get more capital with fewer meetings. They get the attention of a lead who is making a large investment. They get access to the syndicate investors’ networks without putting each one on the cap table. And they can easily collect many small investments.

Link to this
·
Updated Apr 12, 2016








How much do syndicates cost?



Startups don’t pay for syndicate investments. Investors pay 0-25% deal carry to the syndicate lead, and 5% deal carry to AngelList Advisors.Investors also pay the out-of-pocket costs for each deal—currently $8K in the US and £8,300 in the UK. These costs are paid to third parties such as state regulatory agencies, payment processors and accountants—AngelList or AngelList Advisors does not profit from these fees.The lead and AngelList Advisors do not receive carry until the syndicate investors’ investments and out-of-pocket costs are returned.

Link to this
·
Updated Apr 12, 2016








What is the legal structure of a syndicate?



Syndicate investors don't invest directly in a company. They invest in a special purpose fund that is created specifically to invest in the company.  The fund is formed as a series LLC.The fund is managed by Assure Fund Management and advised by AngelList Advisors. The lead also serves as a contractor of AngelList Advisors.The lead usually does not invest through the fund but is required to disclose to AngelList Advisors how she votes, or if she buys or sells shares. If there is a lead, the fund will usually vote with the lead unless she has a conflict of interest or there are other unusual circumstances. If there is no lead, the fund will usually vote with the majority of other shareholders.

Link to this
·
Updated Apr 12, 2016








What is carry?



Carry is a share of the profit of an investment that is paid to the managers of the investment. It is short for ‘carried interest’.In a VC fund, the limited partners of the fund pay carry to the general partners if the entire fund is profitable. This is called fund carry or net carry.In syndicates, investors pay carry to the lead for any profitable investment. This is called deal carry. Syndicates use deal carry so investors can opt out of any investment or stop investing anytime.Learn more about carry and the economics of
syndicates.

Link to this
·
Updated Sep 26, 2016








Do syndicates receive pro rata rights?



Syndicates receive pro rata rights if the lead negotiates them with the startup.  If a syndicate has pro rata rights, syndicate investors in the initial round may have the opportunity to invest their pro rata allocation in subsequent financings. Any remaining allocation may be offered to other investors or funds.  The pro rata may not be offered to syndicate investors if the lead does not participate, if it is unlikely that a reasonable amount of the pro rata will be filled, or for other reasons. Pro rata rights vary in strength and enforceability. Pro rata rights may be waivable by a majority of investors in the round or waived as a condition to a new financing round.

Link to this
·
Updated May 13








What is the 99-investor limit?



Due to securities regulations, syndicates can only accept 99 investors in a deal.A small number of investments support qualified purchasers who are exempt from this requirement. 

Link to this
·
Updated Apr 12, 2016








Who can see a syndicate deal?



The fundraising information of a syndicate deal is visible to accredited investors, while general information about the company is visible to the public.A syndicate lead can also restrict the fundraising information to investors who have been accepted into her syndicate. In this case, she may also restrict general information about the company to these same investors. Furthermore, the company may limit the information visible to investors.

Link to this
·
Updated Apr 12, 2016








Are syndicate investors accredited?



Yes. Investors are required to fill out a questionnaire to establish that they are accredited. Investors in companies that are fundraising publicly must also verify their accreditation by providing evidence such as bank account statements.Learn more »

Link to this
·
Updated Apr 12, 2016








Can investors who are not part of a syndicate invest in syndicate deals?



Yes, but only if they are invited by the syndicate lead. Syndicate investors generally have priority for investments that are oversubscribed.

Link to this
·
Updated Apr 12, 2016








Are syndicates legal?



Syndicates comply with securities regulations, including a no-action relief letter obtained from the SEC.

Link to this
·
Updated Jan 09, 2016








Which institutional investors invest in syndicates?



There are three institutional funds that primarily invest in syndicates. CSC Upshot – A $400M fund in Palo Alto. The fund's largest investor is CSC Group, one of China's top private equity firms.  Several AngelList officers also advise this fund. Learn more »Maiden Lane – A $25M fund in San Francisco. The fund's investors include Top Tier Capital and Makena.AngelList Select Funds – Several funds under $10M, raised from investors on AngelList. and managed by AngelList Advisors.As a group, these funds are referred to as platform funds. Some of these funds may receive more information from companies, syndicate leads, AngelList employees and AngelList affiliates than other investors in a syndicate.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 20, 2016








Leads: How do I create a syndicate?



To create a syndicate, click the ‘Syndicate’ button on your user profile. You can then enter information about how many deals you expect to syndicate each year, your typical investment size and so on.You can then market your syndicate to investors who can agree to invest in your future deals.To syndicate a deal, select the ‘Manage Syndicate’ button on your user profile, then select the ‘Deals’ tab and select the ‘Syndicate a Deal’ button.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Leads: Can my VC fund form a syndicate?



Yes. Individuals and VC funds can both form syndicates.If your fund has LPs, you should confirm that your LP agreement allows you to form a syndicate.Any carry from a syndicate deal can be distributed to your fund’s GPs, LPs or split between them.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Leads: What am I committing to when I start a syndicate?



There are no requirements to simply start a syndicate. Your commitments begin when you syndicate your first deal. You must:Make a significant investment in each dealProvide an investment thesis for each dealDisclose potential conflicts of interest such as warrants, advisory shares or an investment in a previous roundReview and screen potential investors in each dealSign a side letter making you an independent contractor of AngelList Advisors and provide information requested by AngelList AdvisorsRespond to questions from syndicate investors about their investments, although they have limited information rightsLeads are not required to syndicate every investment they make.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Leads: Who can invest in my syndicate?



Any accredited investor can apply to invest in your syndicate. You can then accept or reject the application. You can also remove investors at any time. You should only accept into your syndicate investors whom you trust and want to work with. 

Link to this
·
Updated Jan 31








Leads: Do I invest through the syndicate?



Generally, no. Leads usually invest directly in the company. The syndicate investors invest through a separate fund advised by AngelList Advisors. AngelList Advisors typically advises the fund to follow the lead’s votes and other decisions related to the investment (e.g., sales, pro ratas).

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Leads: Can I share a deal privately to my investors?



Yes. Select the ‘Only my backers’ option when you syndicate a deal. In this case, only investors who have been accepted into your syndicate will see the company’s fundraising information. Learn more.  

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 20, 2016








Leads: What is minimum I have to invest in each deal?



The minimum investment for a lead who is investing her own money is generally 2.5% of the amount that the syndicate raises from individual investors. The minimum investment for a lead who is investing out of a fund raised from limited partners is generally 20% of the amount that the syndicate raises from individual investors.This minimum only applies to capital raised from individuals. Syndicates can raise an unlimited amount of capital from institutional investors such as platform funds.For example, if a lead puts $5K of her own money in a startup, she can raise an additional $195K from individual investors in her syndicate. She can also raise an unlimited amount of capital from a platform fund like CSC Upshot.The minimum investment may be reduced if a notable investor is making a significant investment in the round. It may also be reduced in pro ratas and other special situations. Investors in the syndicate will be notified if the minimum is reduced.Investors can also view the lead's investment amount in any deal and opt out of the deal, for any reason.Learn more
about the economics of syndicates.

Link to this
·
Updated Sep 26, 2016








Leads: What happens if my allocation in a deal is smaller than my syndicate?



Each investor’s commitment will be reduced pro rata if your allocation is smaller than the total commitments from syndicate investors. Here's an example. Sara has a syndicate with 10 accepted investors. Each investor has committed $10K to the syndicate, for a total of $100K. Sara personally invests $20K in the deal and asks for an additional $100K for her syndicate. However, the startup is only able to allocate $50K to the syndicate. So each of her syndicate investors will invest $5K instead of the $10K they requested.If an investor‘s reduced amount is less than the minimum investment for a deal, the investor will invest the minimum investment. In this case, if the reduced amounts still exceed the syndicate's allocation, the lead will use her judgment to reduce investors’ amounts for that deal. The lead will likely favor backers who have expertise in the company‘s markets or have large investment amounts.In some deals, a maximum may be placed on aggregate commitments by the platform funds.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Leads: Should I negotiate for pro rata rights?



Yes. Pro rata rights are important for AngelList and syndicate leads to invest additional capital in winning investments and generate larger returns. For syndicate leads this is especially valuable, since they can still earn carry in follow-on rounds. Leads should negotiate for pro rata rights on all deals.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Leads: What is the lead's carry in a pro rata?



The lead's carry in a pro rata is the same as the initial round, as long as her investment is greater than or equal to either her pro rata allocation or her investment in the initial round, whichever is smaller.The lead's carry in a pro rata will be reduced by 5% if her investment is less than either her pro rata allocation or her investment in the initial round, whichever is smaller. AngelList Advisors, the fund's investment adviser, will receive this additional carry in addition to its usual 5% carry. This is due to  the added work and risk, and since AngelList Advisors is less able to look to the lead’s decision when advising the fund.In both cases, if the lead does not provide access to the pro rata and provide relevant information, she will not earn any carry and AngelList will receive a total of 10% carry.

Link to this
·
Updated Nov 22, 2016








Leads: What should I name my syndicate?



Most leads use their full name for their syndicate because they expect investors to join the syndicate on the basis of their personal reputation.If you are investing on behalf of a firm or if you focus on a specific type of investment, you may wish to choose a different name for your syndicate.Investors should be able to clearly tell who is running the syndicate from the syndicate's name. The name should also not be generic or contain the word ‘syndicate’.“FG Angels” is a good name for a syndicate. “Angel” is not.“Hardware Investments by Vinod Khosla” is a good name for a syndicate. “The Hardware Syndicate” is not.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Leads: Who handles tax documentation?



You will receive K-1’s annually, as needed. Syndicate investors will also receive K-1’s as needed. Be sure to consult your tax advisor.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Leads: Can I promote syndicated deals publicly?



By default your deals are not public and must be compliant with 506(b) of Regulation D. These deals may not be marketed publicly.You may market syndicated deals subject to section 506(c), commonly referred to as general solicitation. You must notify AngelList prior to launching your syndicate if you are operating under 506(c) so that AngelList can comply with all relevant regulation.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Leads: How do I get my deal featured?



If one of the AngelList-affiliated funds invests in your deal, the AngelList team will offer to feature it. Your deal may also be featured if one of these funds approves of featuring the deal. The AngelList-affiliated funds automatically consider every syndicate deal for investment.Featuring happens with the permission of the founder. The AngelList team may feature your deal to a relevant segment of the investor base only.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 20, 2016








Leads: Limitations on syndicate investments in certain foreign companies (PFIC & CFC)




Investments in certain types of foreign companies ares subject to disadvantaged tax treatment and  ongoing compliance requirements. 
These rules are complicated, but if the investment is in a foreign holding company it may be a Passive Foreign Investment Company (PFIC)  and if the investment is in a foreign company that is majority owned by US taxpayers, it may be a Controlled Foreign Corporation (CFC). 
As a result of the added tax and  compliance burdens, AngelList does not generally facilitate investment in either PFIC's or CFC's. When a syndicate makes an investment in a non-US company, the company will be asked to certify that it is neither a PFIC nor a CFC and agree to ongoing compliance requirements. 
 A lead should confirm the PFIC / CFC status with a foreign company early on to avoid wasted efforts. Any investment in a company that cannot certify to being a non-PFIC / CFC will either not be facilitated on AngelList or will require additional disclosures and approvals from AngelList.


Link to this
·
Updated Feb 01








Investors: What am I committing to when I back a syndicate?



You are committing to invest in the syndicate’s deals, on the same terms as the lead. You also agree to pay the lead and AngelList carry on those deals as well as the out-of-pocket costs of each deal. This is not a legally-binding agreement and you can opt out of any agreement or stop investing at any time. All of your existing investments remain intact if you stop investing.

Link to this
·
Updated Sep 26, 2016








Investors: I've indicated investment interest to a syndicate—what's next?



When the next deal is syndicated by the lead, you will be notified and given the opportunity to invest or opt out of investing, depending on the terms of your commitment. The lead will also provide her investment rationale and disclose conflicts of interest.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Investors: What information rights do I have?



Syndicate investors receive less information than direct investors. An AngelList entity or the lead will distribute the following documents to investors when they invest in a syndicate deal:Documents related to the fund’s formation such as its operating agreement, private placement memorandum and subscription agreement.General terms of the investment, if the company permits. Templates of deal documents signed by the fund may also be made available to investors. Qualitative updates on the company status, if available. This is high-level information similar to the information VCs provide to their LPs. For example, it may include information about the company’s customers or financing. It will generally not include any figures.Any information investors need for taxes, such as K-1s, is distributed annually.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Investors: When do I receive a return on my investment?



You will generally receive returns, if any, when the company is acquired or has an IPO. There may also be other opportunities for the syndicate to sell its shares.When there is an exit opportunity, AngelList Advisors, in consultation with the lead, will advise the syndicate fund regarding the best time to sell the syndicates’ shares. The decision to sell the shares is then made by Assure Fund Management. This will generally happen soon after the shares become liquid. If there are any profits, they are distributed to the syndicate investors.The syndicate fund, like all investors, is bound by  agreements with the company and can only sell shares in certain situations.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Investors: Do I have to invest every time one of my syndicates invests in a company?



No. You can opt out of any deal. Many leads indicate whether they expect investors to participate in every deal. 

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Investors: Can I change my investment amount in a particular deal?



Investors can increase or decrease their investment in a particular deal. Any change is subject to approval by the lead. Investors can also opt out of any deal. The lead may also reduce an investor’s investment in a deal, particularly if it is oversubscribed.Investors that regularly lower their investment amounts or frequently opt out of deals may be removed by the lead.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Investors: How does investing in a syndicate differ from investing in a VC fund?




Syndicates are intended to complement, not replace VC funds. Differences include:Syndicate investors choose which startups they want to invest in and can stop investing any timeSyndicates have much lower minimum investmentsLeads typically personally invest more per deal than GPsSyndicates use deal carryExcept in rare cases, syndicates do not charge management feesLearn more »

Link to this
·
Updated Sep 26, 2016








Investors: Why isn't there a higher minimum investment for leads?



Raising the minimum investment would cause some leads to stop syndicating their investments. Instead, they would start or join venture capital funds, which typically have no minimums.The
partners of a VC fund typically provide 1-5% of the fund's capital, but
also take out 15-25% in management fees. In
effect, they don't make a contribution to the fund. The minimum for leads investing their own money in a syndicate is 2.5%. And the minimum for leads investing out of a fund is 20%. Except in rare cases, leads receive no management fees from the syndicate. So, for the vast
majority of leads, syndicates are already more expensive than venture capital
funds. Raising the minimum would cause some leads to stop syndicating their
investments. They would instead invest through a venture capital fund.

Raising the minimum would also cause some leads who are new to investing to stop altogether, because it is already a significant portion of their net worth. This would lead to less diversity of investment opportunities from new leads.Investors who are unhappy with a lead's contribution can always opt out of an investment. They can also invest in AngelList Funds, which make investment decisions on behalf of investors, for no additional cost or carry.Learn more about the economics of syndicates. 

Link to this
·
Updated Sep 26, 2016








Investors: What documents do I sign?



You sign documents to invest in a special-purpose fund that invests in the company. This signature is provided by simply checking a box.You do not sign the company’s financing documents. The company's financing documents are signed by Assure Fund Management for the special-purpose fund.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Investors: Can non-U.S. investors invest in syndicates?



Under U.S. law, yes. You should also check the laws in your country.A Tax Identification Number (TIN) is helpful but not required.Investors inside and outside the U.S. should get tax advice when investing in startups.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Investors: What are the tax consequences of investing in a syndicate?



For each syndicate deal, investors become members of a special-purpose fund formed to make the investment. That fund will purchase preferred shares, convertible debt or other instruments issued by the company.  Certain taxable events may result in income or losses flowing through the special-purpose fund to its investors.  Investors with taxable income or loss will receive K-1s.If the fund holds an equity interest in a portfolio company, there is a taxable event on exits or when the company is dissolved or files for bankruptcy. In rare instances, there may also be a taxable event if the fund receives a dividend or distribution.  If the fund purchases convertible debt, prior to conversion into equity, there may be a tax consequence for your portion of the interest on the debt or in connection with the cancellation of debt such as in a bankruptcy. Be sure to consult your tax advisor.

Link to this
·
Updated Nov 15, 2016








Investors: What are the tax consequences for non-U.S. investors in syndicates?



For each syndicate deal, investors become members in a special-purpose vehicle, structured as a US series LLC. Each syndicate will typically send out IRS Forms K-1 to all its members, both foreign and domestic, in any year in which it has taxable income or deductible expenses. We understand from informal consultation with tax counsel that, generally, income and distributions from AngelList syndicated deals to non-US investors without substantial US business involvement are exempt from US tax and withholding requirements, provided that such investors have submitted the appropriate FATCA Related Forms. AngelList is not qualified to provide tax advice and the above should not be read as tax advice. There are many important exceptions to the generalization stated above, so please be sure to consult your tax advisor and relevant international tax treaties before making an investment.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Investors: What is AngelList Advisors? 



Syndicate investors don't invest directly in a company. They invest in a special-purpose fund that is created specifically for each investment. This fund then invests in the company. The corporate form of the fund is a series of an LLC.The fund is managed by Assure Fund Management and advised by AngelList Advisors, a subsidiary of AngelList. The lead serves as a contractor of AngelList Advisors, providing certain information related to the investment. AngelList Advisors and the lead each receive carry from the special-purpose fund

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Investors: What is a management fee?



A management fee is a quarterly or annual fee added onto a deal, meant to compensate the lead for their time and expenses. Leads may charge management fees for hiring employees, maintaining an office, paying salaries, etc. This is similar to how venture capital firms operate. However, in the case of an AngelList syndicate, because investors can opt in or out on each deal, all economics (including management fees) are calculated on a deal-by-deal basis. 

Link to this
·
Updated Nov 07, 2016








Investors: Which leads can charge management fees?



This is a new feature AngelList is exploring. To start, only leads who incur substantial costs running their AngelList syndicates will charge management fees. Right now this only applies to Gil Penchina. AngelList will determine if other leads qualify for management fees in the future.

Link to this
·
Updated Nov 07, 2016








Investors: How do management fees work?



For each deal, the lifetime total management fee (ex. 3%) is collected upfront and drawn down by the lead over time (ex. 0.25% quarterly, for three years). If there's an exit before the entire management fee is drawn, undrawn capital is returned to investors. If there's a profitable exit, the lead must return the entire amount raised (including the management fee) before earning any carried interest.

Link to this
·
Updated Nov 07, 2016








Investors: How do management fees benefit investors?



Management fees allow leads to hire staff, maintain offices, and be competitive with venture capital firms that have fees at their disposal. Many of the world's top investors are VC General Partners. By introducing management fees, AngelList is better equipped to support this cohort of investors and attract them to share their deals online.Over time, many of the current syndicate leads will face financial pressure to start or join venture capital firms where they can earn fees to offset their costs. They may choose this instead of syndicating. Management fees help mitigate this financial pressure and retain leads on the AngelList platform.

Link to this
·
Updated Nov 07, 2016








Investors: How do I know which deals charge management fees?



Management fees are displayed on the deal page alongside the setup costs that you pay on each deal. There is clear disclosure on deals with management fees. No additional work is required from you to participate in these deals. As always, you should review deal terms before participating and opt out on deals where you don’t like the terms. There are dozens of leads on AngelList with quality deal flow and no management fees.

Link to this
·
Updated Nov 07, 2016








Startups: Can my company be syndicated?



First, you must have a syndicate lead.You must also be a U.S. C corporation, S corporation or LLC (only if the LLC is issuing debt in the financing). U.K. corporations also qualify.Other types of entities may also be syndicated—please contact syndicates@angel.co to discuss an exception.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Startups: On what terms does the syndicate invest?



The syndicate will generally invest on the same terms as the syndicate lead.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Startups: How many investors are added to my cap table?



Syndicates add two investors to your cap table: the lead investor and a special-purpose fund that collects the investors in the syndicate. The individual investors in the special-purpose fund are not listed in your cap table.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Startups: Do syndicate investors count towards my company’s shareholder limit?



No. A syndicate only adds two investors to the company's cap table and syndicate investors should not be counted toward the SEC’s limit of 2000 “shareholders of record” that private companies must observe.

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Startups: How do I post updates to my syndicate?



You can post an update by selecting the ‘For Investors’ tab on your startup profile.You are not required to share any information or communicate with your syndicate. But many companies choose to post monthly updates and ask investors for help. Syndicate investors are often experts in your market and can provide advice and introductions.Although investors are under NDA and forbidden from forwarding confidential information, you should only share information at your own risk. 

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








How long can the syndicate deal accept investments?



Syndicate deals can accept investments for 30 days after launch. Most deals close within 3 weeks of launching. 

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016








Investors: How do I invest in a syndicate deal?



If you are provided with access to a syndicate deal, review information provided by the company and the deal lead carefully.  AngelList and its affiliates as well as their agents take no responsibility for and do not endorse any information concerning companies or deal terms.  Should you decide to invest after performing your own diligence (including reviewing the relevant private placement memorandum, subscription agreement and operating agreement), you will provide various information in the subscription process and execute a copy of the subscription agreement and the operating agreement online. 

Link to this
·
Updated Aug 15, 2016


















Help
·
Directory
·
Blog
Twitter
·
Terms & Risks
·
Unsubscribe

·
Mobile



·
Desktop








 

Fg Angel Syndicate Fund Iv A Series Of Fg Angel Syndicate Funds Llc - Funding history, company info, news ...































Want to see more?Want to find out who got funded, and who’s funding the next big thing? in real time? all across the world? tailored to your specific areas of focus?100+ deals per dayGet access to the most exhaustive worldwide funding watch on the web!Comprehensive funding informationKnow about who invested in a company, which sites covered the event, the funding history, etc.Exclusive insightsView original analytics such as most dynamic industries, most active investors, and more!Stay aware!Get emailed when deals critical to your business happen. Filter by region, industry and topics of interest.As seen onHave a login?Sign inRegister now!It's free!Use your social accountOr fill in the quick form:Register nowpromise we won't spamSign invia your social account:via your existing WGF account:Remember meRegister, it's freeForgot your password?SIGN INForgot your password?Enter your e-mail and we will send you your new password.reset passwordThe world's largest funding base/companies/204600-fg-angel-syndicate-fund-iv-a-series-of-fg-angel-syndicate-funds-llcsection=companies&subsection=detail&id=204600  




			Search deals by company name, industry, location, investors...			
			




SEARCH


Fg Angel Syndicate Fund Iv A Series Of Fg Angel Syndicate Funds LlcCompany DetailsGet alertedif Fg Angel Syndicate Fund Iv A Series Of Fg Angel Syndicate Funds Llc gets funded!Fg Angel Syndicate Fund Iv A Series Of Fg Angel Syndicate Funds LlcFunding history Key peopleCountry:State:City:United StatesCaliforniaSan FranciscoIndustry:Finance Funding history DateDeal sizeInvestors July 24th, 2015$1,070,000-View DealCreate alertManage your alerts in accountWant to know when Fg Angel Syndicate Fund Iv A Series Of Fg Angel Syndicate Funds Llc gets funded?Key peopleLLC AngelList Advisors,DirectorLLC Assure Fund Management,DirectorJeremy NeilsonExecutive OfficerPlease note that all data is automatically extracted and errors can occur.The WhoGotFunded team has not necessarily reviewed the information in this page and has not determined if it is accurate and complete.Inaccurate Data? Help us improve WhoGotFunded: post a comment!


Behind FG Angel: a look at 5 companies funded by Foundry Group's AngelList syndicate | Built In Colorado








































NEWS
EVENTSBuilt In Brews

STARTUPS
JOBS Post a Job
View all jobs

Post a Job sign up
 log in
 


 SEARCH





Search




































Behind FG Angel: a look at 5 companies funded by Foundry Group's AngelList syndicate


 


Posted by Carlin Sack
on Apr 24th, 2014





 

 

 

 

 






Tweet











Late last fall, Boulder's famous Foundry Group opened up its much-anticipated AngelList syndicate, FG Angels, as one of the first to jump in and try out the AngelList syndicate process. Since it is a new process, the guidelines started off fuzzy for both investors and companies. In FG Angels' case, Portland-based OnTheGo agreed to be the "test subjects" and ended up raising $330,000 as the syndicate's first investment.According to their AngelList page, FG Angels is expected to make 50 syndicate investments each year, at at least a $50,000 committment each. So far they have been keeping up that pace, with roughly 10 investments closed via the syndicate as of now, with an average of over $300,000 each (for companies that disclosed the amount).Although FG Angels is made up of investors across the nation, Foundry Group has stayed true to its Colorado roots with 40 percent of its investments going to Colorado companies. Silicon Valley is still a big player for investments as always with about 40 percent of FG Angels-backed companies hailing from San Francisco.The companies that FG Angels has funded range from Boulder-based Uvize (a software platform for veterans) to Boston-based Drync (an e-commerce app for wine lovers). Here is a look into five of the companies funded by FG Angels so far - and what advice they can offer to those looking to do it next... ArtTwo50What they do: ArtTwo50 is the first mobile-only e-commerce art platform that lets users see original artwork hanging on their walls before buying it.Headquarters: San Francisco FG Angels invested: $285,000 in FebruaryPrevious funding: $145,000 in late 2012What they are up to now: Two new hires, a rebrand, two new product launches to compliment their iPad app: “This is the biggest month since we've launched,” Ethan Appleby, CEO and founder, said.What they have to say about the syndicate process: “The biggest lesson learned for was understanding the 99-member limit of an LLC (how the funds are set up). So the syndicate may be worth about $500,000 and you get commitments of about $450,000. So we thought we would get the entire $450,000, but thats not the case because the commitments come from about 250 people and the 99-rule only lets you take 99 investors - with some exceptions (accredited investors aka people worth $5 million or more don't count). Because it’s kind of first-come, first-served, you don't know if the 99 you'll get will be those who invested $25,000 or $1,000.”Advice for other entrepreneurs using AngelList syndicates: “Set expectations. Also get the list of investors and push hard on those who have 'committed' the most, but not yet signed the docs.” RachioWhat they do: Their device called “Iro” is a smart irrigation controller that is powered by intelligent cloud-based software and is controlled via an app or web dashboard.Headquarters: DenverPrevious funding: $350,000 in seed investment before FG Angels announced an investment in AprilWhat they are up to now: “We are heads-down getting ready to ship product at the beginning of May,” co-founder Matt Reisman said. “We are really excited about the launch, we've spent over a year and a half working toward that moment.”Their advice for others working through the syndicate process: “The AngelList process was incredibly easy. I'd say the best advice I'd have is to spend time ensuring that you get good content on your page and be prepared to answer tough questions that will come your way. The timelines for when things happen isn't set in stone as is anything with fundraising. I was actually very surprised how fast a lot of things happened. The AngelList team was very helpful and responsive in the process.” OnTheGoWhat they do: OnTheGo software platform make smart glasses easier to use and the applications on them more powerful.Headquarters: PortlandFunding status: They’ve raised over $1.6 million since September 2013, $330,000 of which came from FG Angels (which was the syndicate’s first investment).How they came to be FG Angels’ first investment: “We met Foundry through one of their portfolio companies in Portland,” Ryan Fink, CEO and founder, said. “We were the first company to go through the syndicate process, so I think our use case is pretty unique. They worked through a lot of the legalities of investing in a company through the AngelList syndicate process and we were happily the test subjects.”Advice to others about the syndicate process: “Have other investors lined up outside of AngelList and use the AngelList process to help propel momentum for raising money.”What they’re working on now: They are planning on launching a new interface for smart glasses called Ari (Augmented Reality Interface) to the public in September with some major partners. RABBLWhat they do: RABBL is a social booking platform for live music.Headquarters: San FranciscoWhat FG Angels invested: nearly $340,000 in MarchWhat they are doing with the funds: “We're already working with our first signed artist this month (Warner Bros) and will be working with our first festival as well,” Wade Lagrone, CEO and co-founder, said. “On the technology side, we've almost got a major feature ready for fans that will connect them even more directly to the ability to tell their favorite bands where to play.”How the AngelList process treated them: “The AngelList syndicate process is great and there are some terrific people helping you through it.”Advice to others looking to raise via an AngelList syndicate: “On our end, we sometimes found some of the numbers confusing. AngelList often states a commitment number as to your raise, but it's important to remember that that number is really a theoretical number, and not to get distracted by it. As it turned out, our partner at Foundry Group, Ryan McIntyre, estimated our raise nearly to the dollar.” Prompt.lyWhat they do: Prompt.ly is the only mobile-first, scheduling, promotion and payment platform for “soloprenuers.”Headquarters: San FranciscoFunding status: They raised $1.5 million in November, $325,000 of it coming from FG Angels.What they say about AngelList syndicates: “The biggest lesson is be prepared,” CEO and co-founder Richard Titus said. “Have all your materials, your video and your content created before going live on AngelList. It's also nice if you can have a friendly journalist do an article right around the time you go live, referencing your profile.”What they are up to now: They are working to get launch their public beta at the end of May (private beta went live in December).  



Attached company




Foundry Group
View company profile
Visit their site

+ Create Job Alert
 


Subscribe to Built In Colorado Weekly Newsletter


Best local tech news weekly




Subscribe







Trending blog posts







Love what you do: 6 Colorado tech companies hiring now 
by April Bohnert











How to fail as a web developer 

Promoted By
General Assembly 











Tech roundup: Ibotta announces funding, Galvanize CEO steps aside and more 
by April Bohnert











Forget networking: 4 tips for building your career support system 

Promoted By
General Assembly 





 

Post a comment
 Sign In or Create an Account to post comments 
Comments



 

Fletcher Richman
    on 04/24/2014 06:06 pm 

    Each investment actually isn't supposed to average $50K. The way the syndicate works is that FG Angels committed $50K to every investment, but the other 'backers' of the syndicate follow along with every investment they do. As you can see from their profile, https://angel.co/fg-angels/syndicate/, they have 220 backers that have committed a total of $439K committed, which gives them a total of $490K in investment power per company they invest in.   















   













Follow on LinkedIn
Like on Facebook
Follow on Twitter
 
ContactPremium Talent Solutions
Send Us a Tip
General Inquiries
Become a Sponsor
AboutOur Team
Our Investors
Terms of Use
Privacy Policy
Powered ByBuilt In Austin
Built In Chicago
Built In Colorado
Built In LA
Built In NYC
Built In Boston
 



Oh no!
You're fresh out of job post slots.Upgrade your planmanage current jobs 

  
Create an account
Facebookconnect with Facebook
 



Let startups find you
Create a profile and upload your resume today.


Facebookconnect with Facebook
 





Invite Your Contacts to Built In ColoradoInvite Gmail ContactsInvite Facebook contactShare link on Twitter 





Explore the local startup scene, find yourdream job and hang with fellow techies.
No sales pitches, just awesome original content.





Join UsJoin Us





 




















Oh no!
You're fresh out of job post slots.



